Utah statutes.
20A-3-109.   Instructions to voters.

(1)  If any voter, after entering the voting booth, asks for further instructions concerning the manner of voting, two poll workers, each from a different political party, shall instruct the voter.

(2)  After instructing the voter, and before the voter has cast his vote, the poll worker shall leave the voting booth so that the voter may vote in secret.

(3)  A poll worker instructing a voter about the voting process may not request, suggest, or seek to persuade or induce the voter to vote for or against any particular ticket, any particular candidate, or for or against any ballot proposition.



Amended by Chapter 75, 2007 General Session

